Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska70-808
Sections, how construed.

Sections 70-801 to 70-808 are and shall be construed to be cumulative, independent legislation, and complete in themselves.

Laws 1949, c. 196, § 7, p. 576.